North Dakota, session 69, HB1495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-03-27 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-03-27. Service in the legislative assembly - Leave of absence from employment.
The executive officer in charge of a state agency, department, or institution or the governing
body of any political subdivision or any other employer in this state may
1. In this section, "employer" means any person that pays salary or wages for work
performed.
2. At an employee's request, an employer shall grant a leave of absence from
employment to a full-time employee of that governmental entity or of that employer
who is a member of the legislative assembly for service during any regular or special
session of the legislative assembly and for attendance at a meeting of the legislative
management or any of its committees.
3. The leave of absence may be without pay, and the employer may reduce or eliminate
the payment of any additional benefits normally due the employee while the employee
is performing legislative service. If the leave of absence is granted, the employerbut
the employer shall employ the employee in the same position, without loss of status or
seniority, and with equivalent pay and accumulation of benefits, including retirement
and leave benefits, following the leave of absence as the employee had before the
leave of absence.
Page No. 1 25.0713.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. An employer may not terminate or threaten to terminate the employment of an
employee solely due to the fact that the employee is absentemployee's absence from
employment as the result of service in the legislative assembly.
5. An employer may not discriminate against an employee solely due to the employee
being a candidate in an election for a seat in the legislative assembly.
Page No. 2 25.0713.02000